Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-5141
Common stock; equity interests.

(1) An insurer may invest in the common stock or rights to purchase or sell common stock of any corporation.

(2)(a) An insurer may invest in equity interests or rights to purchase or sell equity interests in business entities other than general partnerships unless the general partnership is wholly owned by the insurer.

(b) A life insurer shall not invest under this subsection in any investment which the life insurer may invest in under section 44-5140 or 44-5144 or subsection (1) of this section.

(3) A life insurer's investments authorized under this section shall not exceed the greater of one hundred percent of its policyholders surplus or twenty percent of its admitted assets.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 41;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 20;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 18;

Laws 2022, LB863, § 32;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 66.